Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5200.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly hereby finds that:
(1) Young children's healthy brain development and learning depends on consistent,
nurturing care and enriching learning opportunities at home and in early care and education settings.
Starting at birth, day-to-day interactions with family members and early educators shape children’s
brain architecture upon which all future learning and development is built.
(2) Many of the early educators in Rhode Island earn very low wages even when they
achieve credentials equivalent to kindergarten teachers and demonstrate effective practices.
Licensed child care and early learning programs across the state report difficulty attracting,
developing, and retaining effective early childhood professionals.
(3) A 2019 statewide survey of early childhood professionals in Rhode Island found that
over forty percent (40%) of infant/toddler educators worried about having enough food to feed their
family and fifty percent (50%) worried about having enough money to pay for housing.
(4) The 2019 statewide survey also found that almost one-third (1/3) of early educators had
a second job to help make ends meet and almost two-thirds (2/3) reported that they plan to leave
their early education job if the compensation does not improve. And yet, most report that they enjoy
working with children and families and many have earned college credits and degrees in child
development and early education.
(5) A landmark report issued by the National Academy of Science found that educators of
young children, including infants and toddlers, need the same high level of knowledge and

competencies as teachers of older children and that educational qualifications and compensation of
early educators should be equivalent to those of kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12) teachers.
(6) According to 2023 data from the U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics, the median wage for
a child care teacher in Rhode Island was sixteen dollars and ninety-one cents ($16.91) per hour, in
the same range or below the hourly wages of parking lot attendants, maids and housekeepers,
farmworkers, animal caretakers, and retail sales workers.
(7) By enacting this act, the general assembly acknowledges the need to sustain and
strengthen strategies to help licensed child care and early learning programs attract, develop, and
retain effective educators to care for and educate children.
SECTION 2. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
RHODE ISLAND EARLY EDUCATOR WORKFORCE ACT
16-117-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Rhode Island Early Educator
Workforce Act."
16-117-2. Stabilizing and strengthening the early educator workforce.
The departments of human services and education, shall work in collaboration to:
(1) Allocate sufficient funds to continue the Rhode Island T.E.A.C.H. early childhood
program, the statewide, comprehensive, research-based workforce development scholarship
program established under § 16-87-4 to support attainment of the national Child Development
Associate credential and completion of college coursework and degrees in early childhood
education and child or youth development.
(2) Allocate sufficient funds to continue and strengthen registered apprenticeships for early
educators that support attainment of national credentials, college coursework and degrees while
providing opportunities to develop high-quality practices through regular on-the-job coaching by
master early educators.
(3) Allocate sufficient funds of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) per year to
continue the Child Care WAGE$ program, a national model designed to improve compensation,
education, and retention of early educators by providing education-based salary supplements to
low-paid center-based educators, directors, and family childcare providers working with children
in licensed early childhood programs.
LC000725 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000725
========
LC000725 - Page 3 of 4